hi_android/foma/magyar.foma
define HarmRuleszorelolmely §szorelolmely§ -> s z // .#. ?* [ Consnosz | Vowel ] %^ _ ,,
                        §szorelolmely§ -> o l // .#. \"^"* Conssz+ %^ _ ;
define Constnelkul1 [ b | d | f | g | k | p | v ];
define Constnelkul2 [ b | d | f | g | k | p | v | l l ];
define HarmRuletatt §tatt§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul1 ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul1 ] %^ _ ;
define HarmRuletatt1 §tatt1§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt1§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul ] %^ _ ;
define HarmRuletatt2 §tatt2§ -> 0 // .#. ?* [ Constnelkul2 ] %^ _ .o.
                    §tatt2§ -> t // .#. ?* \[ Constnelkul2 ] %^ _ ;
define Suffixl   §l§ -> 0 // l l [ %^ | 0 ] _ .o.
                 §l§ -> l // \[ l l ] [ %^ | 0 ] _ ;

#begin insertion from enhu2.foma
define Etoee e -> é ||  _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* ; # \0: not zero kor & ként excluded
define Atoaa a -> á ||  _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* ; # \0: not zero kor & ként excluded
#derék
define Eetoe é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ k ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} ]   ?*  ;
#bél
define EetoeAcc é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define EtoeeFgg e -> é || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define EetoePP é -> e || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#víz
define IitoiAcc3 í -> i || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define ItoiiFgg3 i -> í || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define IitoiPP3 í -> i || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#tűz
define UeuetoueAcc3 ű -> ü || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define UetoueueFgg3 ü -> ű || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define UeuetouePP3 ű -> ü || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#nyár
define AatoaAcc3 á -> a || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define AtoaaFgg3 a -> á || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
define AatoaPP3 á -> a || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
#kút, úr
define UutouAcc3 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  [ "+" {cAcc} ]  ?*  ;
define UtouuFgg3 u -> ú || .#. \%^* _ [ DCons | Cons ] "^"  ?*  [ {cFam} | {cGen} | {cGenpl} ]    ?*  ;
# úr - ura
define UutouPP3 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ NonPlosivCons+  "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}| "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s}| "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} ]   ?*  ;
# út, kút, lúd - lúdja  rúd ruduk
define UutouPP31 ú -> u || .#. \%^* _ OppNonPlosivCons+ %^  ?*  [ "+" {cPlur}  | "+" {cSoc} | "+" {cDis} |"+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}    | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p}  | "+" {cPossp3s}]   ?*  ;

define UuJtoj §J§ -> j || .#. \%^* ú OppNonPlosivCons+ %^ [ "+" {cPosss3s} ] %^ _ ?*  ;

define HarmRulejaje §AE1§ -> á // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1§ -> é // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ "^"  ?*  [ "+" {cAbl} | "+" {cAcc} | "+" {cAde} | "+" {cAll} | "+" {cCau} | "+" {cDat} | "+" {cDel} | "+" {cEla} | "+" {cFac} | "+" {cIll} | "+" {cIne} | "+" {cIns} | "+" {cSub} | "+" {cSue} | "+" {cSup} | "+" {cTer} | "+" {cFam} | "+" {cDis} | "+" {cEss} | "+" {cSoc}  | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p} | "+" {cPlur} | "+" {cGens} | "+" {cGenpl}] ?* .o.
                 §AE1§ -> a // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?*  _ %^ [ 0 ] .o. 
                 §AE1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ %^ [ 0 ] ;

define Changez2   §oeoez2§ -> §oeoez3§ // .#. ?* [ "+" {cGens} |  "+" {cGenpl} | "+" {cPosss1s}  | "+" {cPosss2s}  | "+" {cPosss3s}  | "+" {cPossp1s}  | "+" {cPossp2s}  | "+" {cPossp3s} | "+" {cPosss1p} | "+" {cPosss2p} | "+" {cPosss3p} | "+" {cPossp1p} | "+" {cPossp2p} | "+" {cPossp3p}|  "+" {cPlur}|  "+" {cFam} ] ?* _ t [0] ;

define HarmRulePlur §oeoez1§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez1§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez1§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRulePluroe §oeoez5§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?*  _  .o.
                 §oeoez5§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?*  _ ,,
                 §oeoez5§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontUnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §oeoez5§ -> e // .#. \"^"* FrontRoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleJJ1   §JJ§ -> j || .#. \"^"* %^  ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleJnull1 §Jnull§ -> 0 || .#. \"^"* %^  ?* _ ;

define HarmRuleul §uue§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §uue§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleuk §UUE1§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §UUE1§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleenkent §ooez3§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?* _  .o.
                 §ooez3§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §ooez3§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleestul §EOA§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^  ?* _  .o.
                 §EOA§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §EOA§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §EOA§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleunk §UUE§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^ ?* _  .o.
                 §UUE§ -> u // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel+  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §UUE§ -> ü // .#. \"^"* FrontVowel \Vowel+ "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok1 §OEOE1§ -> 0 // .#. \"^"* Vowelwithy %^  ?* _  .o.
                 §OEOE1§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE1§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE1§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleotok2 §OEOE§ -> o // .#. \"^"* BackVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE§ -> e // .#. \"^"* Front1UnroundedVowel \Vowel* "^" ?* _ ,,
                 §OEOE§ -> ö // .#. \"^"* Front1RoundedVowel \Vowel*  "^" ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPfi §JP1§ -> j || .#.  ?* _ ,,
                 §JP1§ -> 0 || .#.  ?* _ ;
define HarmRuleJPJ1 §JPJ§ -> j || .#. \"^"*  %^  ?* _ ;
